Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1634.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1914 of Title 69, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority shall install and maintain
retractable road spikes on all exit ramps under its jurisdiction.
The road spikes shall:
1. Automatically retract to allow safe passage for vehicles
exiting the turnpike in the proper direction;
2. Deploy to impede vehicles attempting to enter the exit ramp
in the wrong direction; and

Req. No. 12110 Page 1

3. Be clearly marked and accompanied by appropriate signage to
warn drivers.
B. The Authority shall develop and adhere to safety standards
for the installation, operation, and maintenance of road spikes,
ensuring they do not pose a hazard to vehicles traveling in the
proper direction. The Authority shall conduct routine inspections
and maintenance to ensure the road spikes remain functional and
effective.
C. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority is authorized to promulgate
any rules necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12110 JBH 12/10/24











Req. No. 12110 Page 2